en: Baby Formula
xx: Baby Formula
cs: Kojenecká mléka
da: Baby – modermælkserstatning
de: Milchnahrung
es: Fórmula infantil
fr: Lait en poudre pour bébés
it: Alimenti per bambini
ja: 粉ミルク
nl: Melkpoeder voor baby's
no: Morsmelkerstatning
pl: Mleko w proszku dla niemowląt
pt: Fórmula para bebês
ru: Молочные смеси
sv: Bröstmjölksersättning
tr: Bebek Devam Sütleri

en: Baby Snacks
xx: Baby Snacks
cs: Svačinky pro děti
da: Baby – snacks
de: Baby-Snacks
es: Aperitivos para bebés
fr: Snacks pour bébés
it: Snack per bebè
ja: ベビー用スナック
nl: Babysnacks
no: Babysnacks
pl: Przekąski dla niemowląt
pt: Lanches para bebês
ru: Детские закуски
sv: Mellanmål för barn
tr: Bebek Atıştırmalıkları

en: Toddler Nutrition Drinks & Shakes
xx: Toddler Nutrition Drinks & Shakes
cs: Dětské nutriční nápoje a koktejly
da: Proteindrikke til småbørn
de: Getränke und Milchmischgetränke
es: Bebidas y batidos nutritivos para niños pequeños
fr: Boissons pour bébés et tout-petits
it: Bevande e frullati nutritivi per bebè
ja: 幼児用栄養ドリンク・シェイク
nl: Voedzame drankjes en shakes voor peuters
no: Næringsdrikker og -blandinger til småbarn
pl: Napoje i szejki dla niemowląt
pt: Milk-shakes e bebidas nutritivas para crianças
ru: Напитки и смеси для детского питания
sv: Näringsdrycker och näringsshakes för småbarn
tr: Bebek Ek Gıdaları

en: Baby Bottle Nipples & Liners
xx: Baby Bottle Nipples & Liners
cs: Dudlíky na kojenecké lahve
da: Sutteflaske – sut
de: Sauger für Babyflaschen
es: Tetinas y fundas para biberones
fr: Tétines et sacs pour biberons
it: Tettarelle e sacche usa e getta per biberon
ja: 哺乳瓶用乳首・取替えパック
nl: Spenen en melkzakjes voor babyflessen
no: Flaskesmokker og flaskeinnlegg
pl: Smoczki do butelek
pt: Bicos e revestimentos internos para mamadeira
ru: Соски и вкладыши для детских бутылочек
sv: Sugnappar och insatser till nappflaskor
tr: Biberon Uçları ve Eklentileri

en: Baby Bottle Liners
xx: Baby Bottle Liners
cs: Vložky ke kojeneckým lahvím
da: Indlæg til sutteflaske
de: Flascheneinsätze
es: Bolsas desechables para biberones
fr: Sachets pour biberons
it: Sacchetti interni per biberon
ja: 哺乳瓶ライナー
nl: Liners voor babyflessen
no: Tåteflaskeinnlegg
pl: Wkłady do butelek dla niemowląt
pt: Mamadeira
ru: Антиколиковые клапаны для детских бутылочек
sv: Insatser till nappflaskor
tr: Biberon İç Astarları

en: Baby Bottle Nipples
xx: Baby Bottle Nipples
cs: Dudlíky ke kojeneckým lahvím
da: Sutter til sutteflasker
de: Sauger
es: Tetinas para biberones
fr: Tétines pour biberons
it: Tettarelle
ja: 哺乳瓶用乳首
nl: Spenen voor babyflessen
no: Flaskesmokker
pl: Smoczki do butelek dla niemowląt
pt: Bicos de mamadeira
ru: Соски для детских бутылочек
sv: Flasknappar
tr: Biberon Emzikleri

en: Baby Bottles
xx: Baby Bottles
cs: Kojenecké lahve
da: Sutteflasker
de: Babyflaschen
es: Biberones
fr: Biberons, Biberon
it: Biberon
ja: 哺乳瓶
nl: Zuigflessen
no: Tåteflasker
pl: Butelki dla niemowląt
pt: Mamadeiras
ru: Детские бутылки
sv: Nappflaskor
tr: Biberonlar

en: Baby Care Timers
xx: Baby Care Timers
cs: Zařízení pro časování péče o kojence
da: Babypleje – ur
de: Babypflege-Timer
es: Temporizadores para los cuidados del bebé
fr: Minuteurs pour le soin du bébé
it: Timer per cura bebè
ja: ベビーケアタイマー
nl: Timers voor babyverzorging
no: Tidsur for barnestell
pl: Zegary do pielęgnacji niemowląt
pt: Relógios para cuidados do bebê
ru: Таймеры для ухода за детьми
sv: Babytimers
tr: Bebek Bakım Zamanlayıcıları

en: Bibs
xx: Bibs
cs: Dětské bryndáky
da: Savlesmække
de: Lätzchen
es: Baberos
fr: Bavoirs
it: Bavaglini bebè e bimbi
ja: よだれかけ
nl: Slabbetjes voor baby's en peuters
no: Smekker
pl: Śliniaczki
pt: Babadores
ru: Детские нагрудники
sv: Haklappar
tr: Mama Önlükleri

en: Bottle Warmers & Sterilizers
xx: Bottle Warmers & Sterilizers
cs: Ohřívače a sterilizátory lahví
da: Flaskevarmere og -sterilisering
de: Flaschenwärmer & Sterilisatoren
es: Esterilizadores y calentadores de biberones
fr: Chauffe-biberons et stérilisateurs
it: Scaldabiberon e sterilizzatori
ja: 哺乳瓶用保温器・消毒器
nl: Flessenwarmers en -sterilisators
no: Flaskevarmere og -sterilisatorer
pl: Podgrzewacze butelek i sterylizatory
pt: Aquecedores e esterilizadores de mamadeiras
ru: Подогреватели и стерилизаторы для бутылочек
sv: Flaskvärmare och steriliserare
tr: Biberon Isıtıcı ve Sterilizatörler

en: Breast Milk Storage Containers
xx: Breast Milk Storage Containers
cs: Nádoby na uskladnění mateřského mléka
da: Beholdere til modermælk
de: Muttermilchbehälter
es: Contenedores de leche materna
fr: Récipients de conservation de lait maternel
it: Contenitori per allattamento
ja: 母乳保存容器
nl: Moedermelkopslag
no: Morsmelkbeholdere
pl: Pojemniki na pokarm matki
pt: Recipiente para armazenar leite materno
ru: Контейнеры для хранения грудного молока
sv: Förvaringsbehållare för bröstmjölk
tr: Anne Sütü Depolama Kapları

en: Breast Pump Accessories
xx: Breast Pump Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k odsávačkám mateřského mléka
da: Tilbehør til brystpumper
de: Milchpumpenzubehör
es: Accesorios para sacaleches
fr: Accessoires pour tire-laits
it: Accessori per tiralatte
ja: 搾乳器関連用品
nl: Kolfaccessoires
no: Tilbehør til brystpumpe
pl: Akcesoria do laktatorów
pt: Acessórios para bomba extratora de leite materno
ru: Принадлежности для молокоотсосов
sv: Bröstpumpstillbehör
tr: Göğüs Pompası Aksesuarları

en: Breast Pumps
xx: Breast Pumps
cs: Odsávačky na mléko
da: Brystpumper
de: Milchpumpen
es: Sacaleches
fr: Tire-lait
it: Tiralatte
ja: 搾乳器
nl: Kolfapparaten
no: Brystpumper
pl: Laktatory
pt: Bombas tira-leite
ru: Молокоотсосы
sv: Bröstpumpar
tr: Göğüs Pompaları

en: Burp Cloths
xx: Burp Cloths
cs: Hadříky na odříhnutí
da: Hagesmække
de: Baby-Spucktücher
es: Baberos para eructos
fr: Protège-épaules
it: Panni antirigurgito
ja: 授乳用肩掛け
nl: Spuugdoekjes
no: Gulpekluter
pl: Ściereczki do odbijania
pt: Panos de ombro
ru: Слюнявчики
sv: Kräklappar
tr: Gaz Çıkarma ve Omuz Bezleri

en: Nursing Covers
xx: Nursing Covers
cs: Kojící peleríny
da: Ammetæpper
de: Stilltücher
es: Delantales de lactancia
fr: Capes d'allaitement
it: Foulard e teli copri-allattamento
ja: 授乳ケープ
nl: Voedingsdoeken
no: Ammepledd
pl: Przykrycia do karmienia
pt: Capas de amamentação
ru: Покрывала для кормления грудью
sv: Amningsfiltar
tr: Emzirme Önlükleri

en: Nursing Pads & Shields
xx: Nursing Pads & Shields
cs: Chrániče a vložky do podprsenky
da: Brystpuder og ammebrikker
de: Stillhütchen & -einlagen
es: Protectores y almohadillas de lactancia
fr: Coussinets d'allaitement et téterelles
it: Protezioni per capezzoli e cuscinetti per allattamento
ja: 授乳パッド・乳頭保護器
nl: Zoogkompressen en tepelhoedjes
no: Ammeinnlegg og brystskjold
pl: Wkładki laktacyjne i osłonki na brodawki
pt: Almofadas e protetores para mamilos
ru: Накладки для сосков и вкладыши в бюстгальтеры
sv: Amningskupor och bröstvårtsskydd
tr: Göğüs Pedleri ve Koruyucuları

en: Nursing Pillow Covers
xx: Nursing Pillow Covers
cs: Povlaky na kojicí polštáře
da: Betræk til ammepuder
de: Stillkissenbezüge
es: Fundas para almohadillas de lactancia
fr: Housses pour coussins d'allaitement
it: Coperture per cuscini da allattamento
ja: 授乳クッションカバー
nl: Hoezen voor voedingskussens
no: Overtrekk til ammeputer
pl: Poszewki na poduszki do karmienia
pt: Capas para almofadas de amamentação
ru: Наволочки для кормления грудью
sv: Kuddfodral till amningskuddar
tr: Emzirme Yastığı Kılıfları

en: Nursing Pillows
xx: Nursing Pillows
cs: Kojicí polštáře
da: Ammepuder
de: Stillkissen
es: Almohadas de lactancia
fr: Coussins d'allaitement, coussin d'allaitement
it: Cuscini per allattamento
ja: 授乳用枕
nl: Voedingskussens
no: Ammeputer
pl: Poduszki do karmienia
pt: Almofadas para amamentação
ru: Подушки для кормления грудных детей
sv: Amningskuddar
tr: Emzirme Yastıkları

en: Sippy Cups
xx: Sippy Cups
cs: Hrníčky s pítkem
da: Tudkop
de: Lerntassen
es: Vasitos para bebés
fr: Tasses à bec
it: Tazze per bimbi
ja: フタ付きコップ
nl: Tuitbekers
no: Barnekopper
pl: Kubki-niekapki
pt: Copos mágicos
ru: Детские кружки-непроливайки
sv: Barnmuggar
tr: Suluklar

en: Potty Training
xx: Potty Training
cs: Učení na nočník
da: Pottetræning
de: Töpfchentraining
es: Control de esfínteres
fr: Apprentissage de la propreté
it: Addestramento al vasino
ja: トイレトレーニング
nl: Zindelijkheidstraining
no: Pottetrening
pl: Trening czystości
pt: Desfralde
ru: Товары для приучения к горшку
sv: Potträning
tr: Tuvalet Eğitimi